Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF243.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; WHITE BEAR LAKE AREA HISTORICAL SOCIETY.new text end new text begin $3,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to the White Bear Lake Area Historical Society, a 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization, for the renovation, construction, furnishing, and equipping of the White Bear Armory in White Bear Lake to repurpose the space as a history museum. This appropriation is available until the project is completed or abandoned, subject to Minnesota Statutes, section 16A.642. This is a onetime appropriation. new text end